Georgia, session 2025_26, HB138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 35-8-7 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the powers and
duties of the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council, is amended by revising
paragraph (20) as follows:
"(20) To establish as part of the curriculum for basic and in-service training courses for
all peace officers training on organized criminal activity, and criminal street gangs, and
de-escalation techniques and methods that include scenario based training;"
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
H. B. 138 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 56 0367S
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 138 (SUB)
- 2 -